Massachusetts, session 194th, H4412.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (b) of section 13B of chapter 268 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- If the misconduct
was committed while the person was armed, such person shall be punished by imprisonment in
the state prison for not more than 20 years or by imprisonment in the house of correction for not
more than 2½ years or by a fine of not more than $10,000 or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
of 1